New Jersey, session 221, A4648.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, any State agency, board, commission, authority, or instrumentality responsible for awarding a public contract for construction, goods and services, or professional services may issue an advanced payment of not more than 10 percent of the total value of the contract awarded to the contractor, if such contractor is a business enterprise certified by the Division of Revenue Business Certification Program in the Department of the Treasury.  A contractor shall include, as a part of their bid for any public contract, a request for advanced payment, if the advanced payment shall be necessary for the contractor to fulfill the terms of the contract. b.    A contractor receiving an advanced payment pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall forward to subcontractors an amount of the advanced payment proportionate to the subcontractors estimated charges under the contract, if the subcontractor is also a certified business enterprise in this State, within 60 days of the contractor receiving the advanced payment. c.     Any contractor or subcontractor who receives an advanced payment pursuant to this section shall be liable for repayment of the amount advanced, if the contractor or subcontractor does not begin or complete the work for which the advanced payment was issued. 2.    This act shall take effect 90 days following the date of enactment.